Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1405
Medically handicapped child; birth; duty of attendant to report.

(1) Within thirty days after the date of the birth of any child born in this state with visible congenital deformities, the physician, certified nurse midwife, or other person in attendance upon such birth shall prepare and file with the Department of Health and Human Services a statement setting forth such visible congenital deformity. The form of such statement shall be prepared by the department and shall be a part of the birth report furnished by the department.

(2) For purposes of this section, congenital deformities include a cleft lip, cleft palate, hernia, congenital cataract, or disability resulting from congenital or acquired heart disease, or any congenital abnormality or orthopedic condition that can be cured or materially improved. The orthopedic condition or deformity includes any deformity or disease of childhood generally recognized by the medical profession, and it includes deformities resulting from burns.

Laws 1937, c. 190, § 5, p. 755;

Laws 1941, c. 139, 1, p. 549;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 71-3405;

R.S.1943, § 71-1405;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 563;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 169;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 6;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 35;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 473.

Birth defects, reports, see section 71-648.